Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2411
Participating municipality, defined.

Participating municipality shall mean with respect to an agency, any one of the municipalities which is entitled to appoint a director or directors of such agency pursuant to sections 18-2401 to 18-2485.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 11.